District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.01

Qualifications for licensure.

(a)

In addition to the general qualifications for licensure set forth in subchapter V of this chapter, and any requirements which the Mayor may establish by rule, a dietitian shall:

(1)

Hold a baccalaureate or higher degree with a major in human nutrition, foods and nutrition, dietetics, food systems management, or an equivalent major course of study, approved by the Board, from a school, college, or university that was approved by the appropriate accrediting body recognized by the Council on Postsecondary Accreditation or the United States Department of Education at the time the degree was conferred; and

(2)

Successfully complete the certification examination of the Commission on Dietetic Registration of the American Dietetic Association.

(b)

Licensure to practice dietetics pursuant to this chapter shall also entitle the licensee to use the title of nutritionist.

(c)

In addition to the general qualifications for licensure set forth in subchapter V of this chapter, and any requirements which the Mayor may establish by rule, a nutritionist shall:

(1)

Hold a baccalaureate or higher degree with a major in human nutrition, food and nutrition, dietetics, food systems management, or an equivalent major course of study, approved by the Board, from a school, college, or university that was approved by the appropriate accrediting body recognized by the Council on Postsecondary Accreditation or the United States Department of Education at the time the degree was conferred, or shall have completed other training, approved by the Board, which is substantially equivalent to the curricula of accredited institutions; and

(2)

Successfully complete the examination developed and required by the Mayor and administered by the Board.

(d)

The Mayor, by rule, shall establish requirements for the completion of a planned, continuous, preprofessional program of supervised experience as a condition for licensure as a dietitian or nutritionist.

(e)

The Mayor shall, within 12 months of March 25, 1986, develop, and update as necessary, an examination to assess an applicant’s knowledge and understanding of the principles of nutrition and ability to apply the principles effectively and for the benefit of patients or clients in the practice of nutrition.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 701, 33 DCR 729
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-192, § 8, 33 DCR 7836

History

This section is referenced in § 3-1207.02.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 2-3307.1.

Prior Codifications